Connecticut, session 2026, HB05510.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 19a-502 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) Any person establishing, conducting, managing or operating any
institution without the license required under the provisions of [sections
19a-490 to 19a-503, inclusive, or owning real property or improvements
upon or within which such an institution is established, conducted,
managed or operated,] this chapter or without the certificate required
under the provisions of section [19a-491, shall be fined not more than
one hundred dollars for each offense, and each day of a continuing
violation after conviction shall be considered a separate offense] 19a-561
shall be guilty of a class D felony and fined not more than five thousand
dollars for each day of continuing action in violation of this chapter or
section 19a-561.
(b) Any person owning real property or improvements upon or
within which an institution is established, conducted, managed or
operated without the license required under this chapter or without the
certificate required under section 19a-561 shall be fined not more than
LCO 1 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5510
one hundred dollars for each offense and each day of a continuing
violation after conviction shall be considered a separate offense.
(c) The penalty provisions of this [subsection] section shall not apply
to (1) any financial institution regulated by any state or federal agency
or body, which financial institution has succeeded to the title of the
premises by mortgage foreclosure and the operator, if any, continues to
occupy such property, or (2) a person's failure to apply for a renewal of
a license.
[(b)] (d) If any person conducting, managing or operating any
nursing home facility, as defined in section 19a-521, or residential care
home, as defined in section 19a-521, fails to maintain or make available
the financial information, data or records required under subsection (d)
of section 19a-498, such person's license as a nursing home facility or
residential care home administrator may be revoked or suspended in
accordance with section 19a-517 or the license of such nursing home
facility or residential care home may be revoked or suspended in the
manner provided in section 19a-494, or both.
Sec. 2. Section 19a-503 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) Notwithstanding the existence or pursuit of any other remedy, the
Department of Public Health may, in the manner provided by law and
upon the advice of the Attorney General, conduct an investigation and
maintain an action in the name of the state for injunction or other
process against any person or governmental unit to restrain or prevent
the establishment, conduct, management or operation of an institution
or nursing facility management services, without a license or certificate
under this chapter.
(b) The commissioner may, after a hearing held in accordance with
chapter 54, impose a civil penalty on any person establishing,
conducting, managing or operating any institution without the license
required under this chapter or without the certificate required under
section 19a-561. The amount of any such civil penalty shall not exceed
LCO 2 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5510
twenty-five thousand dollars for each day such person is in violation of
this chapter or section 19a-561.
Sec. 3. Section 19a-11 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
Any board or commission listed in subsection (b) of section 19a-14 or
the Department of Public Health, with respect to professions under its
jurisdiction that have no board or commission, may, in its discretion,
issue [an appropriate] a summary order to any person found to be
violating an applicable statute or regulation, providing for the
immediate discontinuance of the violation that poses an imminent risk
to public health, safety or welfare, pending proceedings to determine
whether to issue a cease and desist order. Such board or commission or
the department, with respect to professions under its jurisdiction that
have no board or commission, may, after a hearing held in accordance
with chapter 54, impose a civil penalty not to exceed twenty-five
thousand dollars on a person who provides professional services under
the department's jurisdiction without a license or certificate issued by
the department. For the purposes of this section, each day of the
provision of any such services shall be grounds for such a penalty. The
board or commission may, through the Attorney General, petition the
superior court for the judicial district wherein the violation occurred, or
wherein the person committing the violation resides or transacts
business, for the enforcement of any order issued by it and for
appropriate temporary relief or a restraining order. Such board or
commission shall certify and file in such court a transcript of the entire
record of the hearing or hearings, including all testimony upon which
such order was made and the findings and orders made by such board
or commission. The court may grant such relief by injunction or
otherwise, including temporary relief, as it deems equitable and may
make and enter a decree enforcing, modifying and enforcing as so
modified, or setting aside, in whole or in part, any order of the board or
commission.
LCO 3 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5510
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 19a-502
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 19a-503
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 19a-11
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 3, "In addition to a cease and desist order, such board or
commission or the department may, after a hearing held in accordance
with chapter 54, impose a civil penalty not to exceed twenty-five
thousand dollars for the provision of services without a license or
certificate in violation of the provisions of this title." was changed to
"Such board or commission or the department, with respect to
professions under its jurisdiction that have no board or commission,
may, after a hearing held in accordance with chapter 54, impose a civil
penalty not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars on a person who
provides professional services under the department's jurisdiction
without a license or certificate issued by the department." for clarity and
accuracy.
PH Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 4 of 4